Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB912.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 6109(c), (d), (e)(1)(i) and (k) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 6109. Licenses.* * *(c) Form of application and content.--The application for a license to carry a firearm shall be uniform throughout this Commonwealth and shall be on a form prescribed by the Pennsylvania State Police. The form may contain provisions, not exceeding one page, to assure compliance with this section but may not require or use references. Issuing authorities shall use only the application form prescribed by the Pennsylvania State Police. One of the following reasons for obtaining a firearm 123456789101112131415161718 license shall be set forth in the application: self-defense, employment, hunting and fishing, target shooting, gun collecting or another proper reason. The application form shall be dated and signed by the applicant and shall contain the following statement:I have never been convicted of a crime that prohibits me from possessing or acquiring a firearm under Federal or State law. I am of sound mind and have never been committed to a mental institution. I hereby certify that the statements contained herein are true and correct to the best of my knowledge and belief. I understand that, if I knowingly make any false statements herein, I am subject to penalties prescribed by law. I authorize the sheriff, or his designee, or, in the case of first class cities, the chief or head of the police department, or his designee, to inspect only those records or documents relevant to information required for this application. If I am issued a license and knowingly become ineligible to legally possess or acquire firearms, I will promptly notify the sheriff of the county in which I reside or, if I reside in a city of the first class, the chief of police of that city.(d) Sheriff to conduct investigation.--The sheriff to whom the application is made shall:(1) investigate the applicant's record of criminal conviction;(2) investigate whether or not the applicant is under indictment for or has ever been convicted of a crime punishable by imprisonment exceeding one year;[(3) investigate whether the applicant's character and 20250HB0912PN0952 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 reputation are such that the applicant will not be likely to act in a manner dangerous to public safety;](4) investigate whether the applicant would be precluded from receiving a license under subsection (e)(1) or section 6105(h) (relating to persons not to possess, use, manufacture, control, sell or transfer firearms); [and](5) conduct a criminal background, juvenile delinquency and mental health check following the procedures set forth in section 6111 (relating to sale or transfer of firearms), receive a unique approval number for that inquiry and record the date and number on the application[.]; and(6) n ot keep or retain information relevant to the investigation beyond the initial application and proof of approval for more than 10 days beyond successful issuance or denial of license.(e) Issuance of license.--(1) A license to carry a firearm shall be for the purpose of carrying a firearm concealed on or about one's person or in a vehicle and shall be issued if, after an investigation not to exceed 45 days, it appears that the applicant is an individual concerning whom no good cause exists to deny the license. A license shall not be issued to any of the following:[(i) An individual whose character and reputation is such that the individual would be likely to act in a manner dangerous to public safety.]* * *(k) Reciprocity.--(1) The Attorney General shall have the power and duty to enter into reciprocity agreements with other states 20250HB0912PN0952 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 providing for the mutual recognition of a license to carry a firearm issued by the Commonwealth and a license or permit to carry a firearm issued by the other state. To carry out this duty, the Attorney General is authorized to negotiate reciprocity agreements and grant recognition of a license or permit to carry a firearm issued by another state.(1.1) The Attorney General shall seek to establish reciprocity agreements with every state and may not unilaterally withdraw from any reciprocity agreement.(2) The Attorney General shall report to the General Assembly within 180 days of the effective date of this paragraph and annually thereafter concerning the agreements which have been consummated under this subsection.(3) The report concerning reciprocity agreement progress between states shall detail the efforts the Attorney General has made to establish reciprocity agreements with other states, and for each state the Commonwealth does not have a reciprocity agreement with, explain the reason why an agreement could not be reached.* * *(m.4) Violations by issuing authority.--An applicant denied these rights shall be entitled to attorney fees and costs in any action against the issuing authority to enforce this section.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0912PN0952 - 4 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425